Arkansas, session 2025, HB1696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title — Legislative intent.
(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Strengthening
Arkansas Education Act".
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly:
(1) That undergraduate students in state-supported institutions
of higher education acquire knowledge and skills that enable the students to
contribute to their state and country as informed, self-reliant, and civic-
minded citizens;
(2) To implement a fully transferrable core curriculum for
state-supported colleges and universities that ensures a general education
that provides students in Arkansas with a shared knowledge of the history,
ideals, and institutions of America, along with a proper introduction to
logic, reasoning, and communications;
*CRH109*
03-31-2025 12:07:28 CRH109

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H3/31/25 HB1696
(3) To ensure that general education survey courses provide
students with a broad understanding of a subject's core ideas, theories, and
history, fulfilling breadth requirements and fostering a well-rounded
education;
(4) That the requisite core curriculum in this act serve as a
basis for a minimum general education core curriculum established by the
Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board for state-supported institutions
of higher education; and
(5) To promote a coordinated system of higher education in Arkansas
and to assure an orderly and effective development of each of the state-
supported institutions of higher education.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-41-704(2), concerning the exemption under
the Building Better Futures Program from the state minimum core curriculum,
is repealed.
(2) Be exempt from the higher education state minimum core curriculum
as determined by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board under § 6-
61-218;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-41-804(2), concerning the exemption under
the Building Better Futures High School Program from the state minimum core
curriculum, is repealed.
(2) Be exempt from the higher education state minimum core curriculum
as determined by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board under § 6-
61-218;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-61-105 is repealed.
6-61-105. Course in American history or civil government required.
(a) A state-supported institution of higher education shall not grant
to any student a baccalaureate degree unless he or she has passed a course in
American history or civil government, including:
(1) Instruction in the essentials of the United States
Constitution; and
(2) The study of American institutions and ideals.
(b) The Division of Higher Education shall see to the strict carrying
out of this section and may take such steps and measures as may be necessary
03-31-2025 12:07:28 CRH109

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H3/31/25 HB1696
to effectuate its provisions.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 61, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-61-144. Arkansas Requisite Core Curriculum — Definitions.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas
Requisite Core Curriculum”.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Minimum general education core curriculum means” the
minimum general education core curriculum requirements for associate and
baccalaureate degree programs at state-supported institutions of higher
education;
(2) “Requisite core curriculum" means the fifteen (15) semester
credit hours of introductory survey courses as determined by the Division of
Higher Education;
(3) “State-supported institution of higher education” means a
public postsecondary institution or a department in a public postsecondary
institution that:
(A) Provides:
(i) An eligible program of training to prepare a
student for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; or
(ii) A program leading to an associate degree or a
baccalaureate degree; and
(B) Is accredited by a recognized accrediting agency or
association and has continuously held the accreditation for the number of
years required by the division.
(c)(1) Beginning with the entering class of fall 2027, the division,
in consultation with the state-supported institutions of higher education,
shall establish a minimum general education core curriculum that shall:
(A) Include the requisite core curriculum; and
(B) Apply toward the minimum requirements for associate
and baccalaureate degrees at the state-supported institutions of higher
education.
(2) The general education core curriculum shall be fully
transferable among all state-supported institutions of higher education.
completed the minimum general education core curriculum as determined by the
03-31-2025 12:07:28 CRH109

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H3/31/25 HB1696
division.
(d) The requisite core curriculum shall include the following fifteen
(15) semester credit hours of introductory survey courses:
(1) Two (2) three-semester credit hours of oral or written
communication designed to develop the ability to organize ideas and to
communicate, with clarity, precision, and syntactical maturity;
(2) A three-semester credit hour course that cultivates critical
thinking, problem-solving, and logical reasoning skills; and
(3) A three-semester credit hour course in American history and
a three-semester credit hour course in American government, including:
(A) Instruction in the essentials of the United States
Constitution; and
(B) The study of American institutions and ideals.
(e) To ensure compliance with this section, the division may establish
reporting requirements for state-supported institutions of higher education
detailing implementation of the requisite core curriculum.
(f) In determining whether a course meets the general education core
curriculum requirements, the division may:
(1) Exempt Applied Science degrees;
(2) Grant credit hour equivalency for competency-based and
proficiency-based baccalaureate degree programs; and
(3) Allow for substitution of advanced coursework with specified
majors, with the exception that American Government and American History are
required for every student.
(g) The division may promulgate rules to implement this section.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-61-218 is repealed.
6-61-218. Minimum college core — Transferability.
To promote a coordinated system of higher education in Arkansas and to
assure an orderly and effective development of each of the state-supported
institutions of higher education, the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating
Board shall establish in consultation with state-supported institutions of
higher education a minimum core of courses which shall apply toward the
general education core curriculum requirements for associate and
baccalaureate degrees at state-supported institutions of higher education and
which shall be fully transferable among all state-supported institutions of
03-31-2025 12:07:28 CRH109

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 H3/31/25 HB1696
higher education.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-61-231(a)(4)(A), concerning the
definition of "state minimum core curriculum" related to statewide transfer
agreements, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) “State minimum core curriculum” means sixty (60) semester
hours of lower-division coursework that include the thirty-five-hour general
education core, major program prerequisites, and elective requirements that
satisfy the requirements of an associate of arts degree, an associate of
science degree, an associate of arts in teaching degree, and selected
baccalaureate degrees at all public institutions of higher education as
determined by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

/s/McAlindon






















03-31-2025 12:07:28 CRH109